Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2305.   Penalties for artificially dividing a purchase.

A person who violates Subsection 63G-6a-408(8) or (9) is guilty of:

(1)  a felony of the second degree if the total value of the divided procurements is $1,000,000 or more;

(2)  a felony of the third degree if the total value of the divided procurements is $250,000 or more, but less than $1,000,000;

(3)  a class A misdemeanor if the total value of the divided procurements is $100,000 or more, but less than $250,000; or

(4)  a class B misdemeanor if the total value of the divided procurements is less than $100,000.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

